Wyoming, session 2026, SF0092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-44-101 through 1-44-107 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 44
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
WYOMING FALSE CLAIMS ACT

1-44-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
False Claims Act."

1-44-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Claim" means:

(A) Any request or demand, whether under a
contract or otherwise, for money or property, and whether
or not the state has title to the money or property, that:

(I) Is presented to an officer,
employee or agent of the state; or

(II) Is made to a contractor, grantee
or other recipient, if the money or property is to be spent
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
or used on the state's behalf or to advance a state program
or interest, and if the state:

(1) Provides or has provided any
portion of the money or property requested or demanded; or

(2) Will reimburse the
contractor, grantee or other recipient for any portion of
the money or property that is requested or demanded.

(ii) "False claims law investigation" means any
inquiry conducted by any person on behalf of the state for
the purpose of ascertaining whether any person is or has
engaged in any violations of this act;

(iii) "Knowing" or "knowingly" means:

(A) That a person, with respect to
information and without requiring proof of specific intent
to defraud, does any of the following:

(I) Has actual knowledge of the
information;
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278

(II) Acts in deliberate ignorance of
the truth or falsity of the information; or

(III) Acts in reckless disregard of
the truth or falsity of the information.

(iv) "Material" means having a natural tendency
to influence, or be capable of influencing, the payment or
receipt of money or property;

(v) "Obligation" means an established duty,
whether or not fixed, arising from an express or implied
contractual, grantor-grantee or licensor-licensee
relationship, from a fee-based or similar relationship,
from statute or regulation or from the retention of any
overpayment;

(vi) "Original source" means a person who:

(A) Has voluntarily disclosed to the state
the information on which allegations or transactions in a
claim are based; or
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278

(B) Has knowledge that is independent of
and materially adds to the publicly disclosed allegations
or transactions, and who has voluntarily provided the
information to the state before the state files an action
under this act.

(vii) "Proceeds" means civil penalties and
damages as provided by this act;

(viii) "Prosecuting authority" means any
official other than the attorney general charged with
investigating, filing and conducting civil legal
proceedings on behalf of, or in the name of, the state;

(ix) "State" means the state of Wyoming, its
agencies, boards, political subdivisions as defined by W.S.
9-2-401(a)(iv), instrumentalities, officers and employees,
including the University of Wyoming;

(x) "This act" means W.S. 1-44-101 through
1-44-107.

SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
1-44-103. False claims liability; damages; costs;
civil penalties; exceptions.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
any person who commits any of the following acts shall be
liable to the state for three (3) times the amount of
damages that the state sustains because of the actions of
that person. A person who commits any of the following acts
shall also be liable to the state for the costs of a civil
action brought to recover penalties or damages and shall be
liable to the state for a civil penalty of not less than
five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500.00) and not more
than eleven thousand dollars ($11,000.00) for each false or
fraudulent claim where the person:

(i) Knowingly presents, or causes to be
presented, a false or fraudulent claim for payment or
approval;

(ii) Knowingly makes, uses or causes to be made
or used a false record or statement material to a false or
fraudulent claim;

SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
(iii) Has possession, custody or control of
property or money used, or to be used, by the state and
knowingly delivers, or causes to be delivered, less than
all of that money or property;

(iv) Is authorized to make or deliver a document
certifying receipt of property used, or to be used, by the
state and, intending to defraud the state, makes or
delivers the receipt without knowing whether the
information on the receipt is true;

(v) Knowingly buys, or receives as a pledge of
an obligation or debt, public property from an officer or
employee of the state who lawfully may not sell or pledge
property;

(vi) Knowingly makes, uses or causes to be made
or used a false record or statement material to an
obligation to pay or transmit money or property to the
state, or knowingly conceals or knowingly and improperly
avoids or decreases an obligation to pay or transmit money
or property to the state;

SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
(vii) Conspires to commit a violation of this
subsection;

(viii) Is a beneficiary of an inadvertent
submission of a false or fraudulent claim to the state,
subsequently discovers the falsity of the claim and fails
to disclose the false or fraudulent claim to the state; or

(ix) Is the beneficiary of an inadvertent
payment or overpayment by the state of funds not due and
knowingly fails to repay the inadvertent payment or
overpayment to the state.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a
court may assess not more than two (2) times the amount of
damages that the state sustains because of a violation of
subsection (a) of this section, and shall assess no civil
penalty, if the court finds all of the following:

(i) The person committing the violation
furnished officials of the state responsible for
investigating false claims violations with all information
known to that person about the violation within thirty (30)
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
days after the date where the person first obtained the
information;

(ii) The person fully cooperated with any
investigation by the state;

(iii) At the time the person furnished the state
with information about the violation, no criminal
prosecution, civil action or administrative action had
commenced with respect to the violation, and the person did
not have actual knowledge of the existence of an
investigation into the violation.

(c) Liability pursuant to this section shall be joint
and several for any act committed by two (2) or more
persons.

(d) This act shall not apply to claims made:

(i) Pursuant to a workers' compensation claim;

(ii) Regarding the payment of sales taxes under
title 39 of the Wyoming statutes;
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278

(iii) Regarding the assets of a person that have
been transferred to the commissioner of the department of
insurance under title 26 of the Wyoming statutes;

(iv) Regarding services requested under the
Wyoming medicaid program;

(v) Regarding federal welfare benefits;

(vi) Regarding money, property or services that
the state has paid to a person as compensation for
employment with the state or as an income subsidy with no
restrictions on that person's use of the money, property or
services.

1-44-104. Investigations and prosecutions; powers of
prosecuting authority; civil actions; jurisdiction of
courts.

(a) The following shall apply to investigations of
false claims under this act:

SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
(i) The attorney general or applicable
prosecuting authority shall diligently investigate
violations of this act. If the attorney general finds that
a person has violated this act, the attorney general or the
applicable prosecuting authority may bring a civil action
under this section against that person;

(ii) An applicable prosecuting authority shall
have the right to intervene in an action brought by the
attorney general under this section not more than sixty
(60) days after the attorney general notifies the
prosecuting authority of a violation of this act within the
prosecuting authority's jurisdiction. A court may permit
intervention if the Wyoming Code of Civil Procedure and
Rules of Civil Procedure have been adhered to.

(b) The following shall apply to civil actions
brought due to violations prohibited by this act:

(i) The parties of civil actions shall adhere to
the requirements of the Wyoming Code of Civil Procedure and
Rules of Civil Procedure;

SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
(ii) No court shall have jurisdiction over an
action brought pursuant to this act against a member of the
legislature, a member of the judiciary, an elected official
or a member of any governing body if the action is based on
a false claim where evidence or information about the claim
was known to the state when the action is brought;

(iii) The attorney general or applicable
prosecuting authority shall not bring an action that is
based upon allegations or transactions that are the subject
of a civil action or penalty proceeding where the state is
already a party;

(iv) A court may dismiss an action or claim
under this section if substantially the same allegations or
transactions were publicly disclosed in any of the
following:

(A) A criminal, civil or administrative
proceeding where the state or prosecuting authority are a
party;

SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
(B) A report, hearing, audit or
investigation of the legislature or the state;

(C) The news media.

(v) Paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall not
apply if the action is brought by the attorney general or
applicable prosecuting authority or the person bringing the
action is the original source of the information;

(vi) Unless otherwise authorized by law, a court
shall not have jurisdiction over an action based upon
information discovered by a present or former employee of
the state during the course of that employee's employment
unless that employee first, in good faith, exhausts
existing internal procedures for reporting and seeking
recovery of the falsely claimed sums through official
channels and unless the state failed to act on the
information provided within a reasonable period of time.

(c) The false claims act account is hereby created.
Notwithstanding W.S. 5-9-106 or any other law, thirty-three
percent (33%) of the proceeds of an action or settlement of
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
a claim by the attorney general or a prosecuting authority
pursuant to this act shall be deposited into the account.
The remaining proceeds of an action or settlement of a
false claim shall be deposited into the public school fund
of the applicable county in which the false claim arose.
Funds in the account, upon appropriation by the
legislature, shall:

(i) Be continuously appropriated to the office
of the attorney general;

(ii) Be used by the attorney general to support
the ongoing investigation and prosecution of false claims
pursuant to this act;

(iii) Unless otherwise specifically provided,
not lapse or revert at the end of the fiscal period and
shall remain in the account; and

(iv) Regarding interest or other earnings on
funds within the account, be credited to the account.

1-44-105. Relief from retaliatory actions.
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278

(a) In addition to the remedies provided by W.S.
9-11-103 if applicable, any employee, contractor or agent
shall be entitled to all relief necessary to make that
employee, contractor or agent whole if that employee,
contractor or agent is discharged, demoted, suspended,
threatened, harassed or in any other manner discriminated
against in the terms and conditions of employment because
of lawful acts done by the employee, contractor, agent or
associated others in furtherance of an action under this
act or other efforts to stop one (1) or more violations of
this act.

(b) The relief authorized under subsection (a) of
this section shall include:

(i) Reinstatement with the same status that the
employee, contractor or agent would have had but for the
retaliation;

(ii) Two (2) times the amount of back pay;

(iii) Interest on the back pay;
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278

(iv) Compensation for any special damages
sustained as a result of the retaliation, including
litigation costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(c) An action seeking relief under this section may
be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction, provided
that a civil action seeking relief under this section may
not be brought later than the times specified in W.S.
1-44-106.

1-44-106. Limitation of actions; burden of proof.

(a) A civil action brought under this act shall not
be brought more than three (3) years after the date when
the facts material to the right of action are known or
reasonably should have been known by the attorney general
or other prosecuting authority, but in no event more than
six (6) years after the date where the violation of this
act was committed.

(b) In any civil action brought under this act, the
state shall be required to prove all essential elements of
SF0092

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0278
the cause of action, including damages, by a preponderance
of the evidence.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
judgment of guilt in a criminal proceeding charging false
statement or fraud, upon a verdict after trial or upon a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere, shall estop the
defendant from denying the essential elements of the
offense in any action brought pursuant to this act which
involves the same transaction as in the criminal
proceeding.

1-44-107. Remedies pursuant to other laws;
severability.

The provisions of this act are not exclusive, and the
remedies provided for shall be in addition to any other
remedies provided for in any other law or available
pursuant to common law.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0092